Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 35 Highway Accident Agreements

6-35-1.
Agreements.

Any contractual agreement relating to the repair of a motor vehicle entered into as a direct and immediate result of an automobile collision on a public highway, thoroughfare, or street may be rescinded at the option of the owner of the motor vehicle within forty-eight (48) hours after the occurrence of the accident by presenting written notice of the rescission to the other party. The owner of the motor vehicle shall not be liable for the cost of any repair work done prior to the expiration of the rescission period and the motor vehicle must be returned to the owner upon request.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 143, § 1.

6-35-2.
Exemptions.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall apply to a contractual agreement for the towing of a motor vehicle or for services directed by a law enforcement officer in the exercise of his or her duly authorized police powers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 143, § 1.

6-35-3.
Conflict with other law.

Whenever the application of any provisions of any other law of this state conflicts with the application of any provision of this chapter, then this chapter shall prevail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 143, § 1.